Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2130.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Franco Harris Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Franco Harris was born in Fort Dix, New Jersey, on March 7, 1950.(2) Mr. Harris was named one of the 44 best high school football players by Kick-Off Magazine his junior year and chosen as a College All-Star his senior year at The Pennsylvania State University.(3) Mr. Harris began his professional football career as the Pittsburgh Steelers' first pick and the 13th player selected in the 1972 Draft of the National Football League 123456789101112131415161718 (NFL).(4) For 12 seasons, Mr. Harris was a big-yardage running back and a key man in the powerful Pittsburgh offensive machine, which also included an outstanding passing attack.(5) Mr. Harris established himself as a future superstar, being only the fourth rookie in the NFL annals to rush for 1,000 yards, and his six straight 100-yard rushing games as a rookie tied a record set by Jim Brown.(6) Mr. Harris' Immaculate Reception, which occurred on December 23, 1972, was officially declared by the NFL as the number one moment and number one play in the NFL's first 100 years.(7) Mr. Harris was the NFL Offensive Rookie of the Year in 1972.(8) In his 13 seasons, Mr. Harris rushed 2,949 times for 12,120 yards and 91 touchdowns.(9) Mr. Harris rushed for 1,000 yards or more in eight seasons and for more than 100 yards in 47 games and also caught 307 passes for 2,287 yards and nine touchdowns.(10) Mr. Harris' career rushing total and his combined net yardage figure of 14,622 both ranked as the third highest marks in professional football history at the time of his retirement.(11) Mr. Harris was an All-AFC choice in 1972, 1975, 1976 and 1977 and first-team or second-team All-Pro six times.(12) Selected to nine Pro Bowls, Mr. Harris played in five AFC championships, missing a sixth because of injury, and four Super Bowls.(13) Mr. Harris was named the game's Most Valuable 20260HB2130PN2756 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Player in Super Bowl IX, when the Steelers won their first-ever league title with a 16-6 victory over Minnesota, rushing for 158 yards, compared to just 17 yards rushing for the entire Vikings team.(14) Mr. Harris became the first African American and first Italian American to be named a Super Bowl Most Valuable Player.(15) By the end of his career, Mr. Harris held numerous Super Bowl and postseason game records, notably including 24 points and 354 yards rushing in four Super Bowls and 17 touchdowns and 1,556 yards rushing in 19 postseason playoff games.(16) Mr. Harris received the American Academy of Achievement Golden Plate Award as the NFL Player of the decade in 1984.(17) In 1990, Mr. Harris was inducted into the Pro Football Hall of Fame.(18) Beginning in the 1970s, Mr. Harris became a March of Dimes spokesperson and fundraiser.(19) Through the Pittsburgh Multiple Sclerosis Society, Mr. Harris was a chairman for READ-a-thon, a reading program developed by the National Multiple Sclerosis Society and initiated in the Pittsburgh area in 1974 by Harris.(20) In 1976, Mr. Harris was named the NFL Man of the Year, now known as the Walter Payton Award, for excellence on the field and in the community.(21) Mr. Harris was named to the Easter Seals Board of Directors in 1978.(22) In 1982, he received the Whizzer White Humanitarian Award from the NFL Players Association honoring the player 20260HB2130PN2756 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who shows high aspirations for serving his team, community and nation.(23) From 1987 through 1995, Mr. Harris served as the Pennsylvania chairman of the Governor's Council on Physical Fitness and Sports.(24) As an advocate for bike trails and cycling, Mr. Harris served as a member of the Rails-to-Trails Conservancy Board of Directors from 1992 to 1997.(25) In 1997, Mr. Harris was selected as the National Multiple Sclerosis Volunteer of the Year recognizing his years of work locally and nationally.(26) In 1997, Mr. Harris camped out at Pittsburgh's City County Building when the Ku Klux Klan was scheduled to speak, in defiance of racial hatred.(27) As the son of an Army veteran who served in both World War II and Korea, Mr. Harris traveled on a USO tour with the NFL in 1974 and in 2002, beginning his annual tradition of visiting veterans hospitals every Super Bowl weekend.(28) Mr. Harris was a Trustee and Founding Chairman of the Western Pennsylvania Sports Museum at the Smithsonian-affiliated Senator John Heinz History Center.(29) Mr. Harris was named as Conti Professor for The Pennsylvania State University's School of Hospitality Management, and in 2005 he was recognized by Penn State as an Alumni Fellow, the highest honor conferred by the Penn State Alumni Association.(30) Mr. Harris was a recipient of the First Annual OT 10 Awards for Community Impact presented by OverTime Magazine in 2005 which recognizes athletes who contribute unyielding 20260HB2130PN2756 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 support through community service, charitable donations and entrepreneurial business endeavors.(31) Mr. Harris was founding board chair and leader for Pittsburgh Promise in 2007 and established the Franco and Dana Harris Scholars Fund for college scholarship.(32) Mr. Harris was a long-time supporter of Special Olympics and member of Special Olympics Pennsylvania's Executive Advisory Board, raising money for the nonprofit organization at the Beaver Stadium Run every year since 2010, and receiving the first ever Beaver Stadium Run Community Hero Award in 2013.(33) In 2011, Mr. Harris was inducted into the New Jersey Hall of Fame for his commitment to community and remained a lifelong supporter of his hometown of Mount Holly and fundraiser for youth programs through the Mount Holly Pro Day.(34) In 2011, Mr. Harris received the "Partners in Warmth, People's Natural Gas Award" recognizing 20 years of service promoting an energy assistance program.(35) In 2012, Mr. Harris received the Mother Frances Schervier award from the Franciscan Sisters of the Poor for his years of fundraising and support.(36) Mr. Harris received the National Urban League's Whitney M. Young Award and, in 2022, received the Urban League of Greater Pittsburgh's Ronald H. Brown Leadership award.(37) In 2022, Mr. Harris was the first offensive player ever to have his number retired by the Steelers, being recognized by former President Barack Obama as a "role model and community builder."20260HB2130PN2756 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Designation.--The bridge, currently identified as the Fort Duquesne Bridge, carrying U.S. Route 279 over the Allegheny River in the City of Pittsburgh, Allegheny County, is designated as the Franco Harris Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2130PN2756 - 6 - 123456789